Tennessee, session 114, SB2188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-315, is amended by deleting
"All school funds" in subsection (a) and substituting "Except as provided in subsection (d), all
school funds" and by adding the following as a new subsection:
(d)
(1) As used in this subsection (d):
(A) "County" means a county that:
(i) Operates a county school system;
(ii) Has five (5) or more special school districts operating
within its geographic boundaries; and
(iii) Has at least one (1) special school district operating
within its geographic boundaries that has established a virtual
school pursuant to the Virtual Public Schools Act, compiled in
chapter 16, part 2 of this title; and
(B) "WFTEADA" means one (1) full-time equivalent average daily
attendance for each student whose primary legal residence is located in
the county multiplied by the cost differential for a program.
(2) All school funds for current operation and maintenance purposes
collected by a county, except the funds raised by any local special student
transportation tax levy as authorized in subsection (a), must be apportioned by
SB2188
011894
- 1 -

the county trustee among the LEAs in the county on the basis of the WFTEADA
maintained by each, during the current school year.
(3) For purposes of making the apportionment of local school funds as
set forth in this subsection (d), and in defining the WFTEADA for the current
school year, the county director of schools and the county trustee must be guided
by the same procedure in subdivisions (a)(1)-(5); provided, that the terms defined
in this subsection (d) apply to the use of such terms in subdivisions (a)(1)-(5) for
purposes of making apportionments pursuant to this subsection (d).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011894